Louisiana, session 2026, HB924.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2784.1(B)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2784.1. Repair contracts entered into during a state of emergency; venue;
rescission
* * *
B.
* * *
(4) Each disaster repair contract shall include, in at least fourteen point bold
type, a notice of the owner's right to cancel under this Subsection and a simple
cancellation form that the owner may sign and deliver or mail. Failure to include the
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 924
notice and cancellation form provided in this Paragraph shall extend the cancellation
period provided in this Subsection to thirty days from the date of execution.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:2164(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
37:2158(A)(8)(c) and 2159.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2158. Revocation and suspension of licenses; issuance of cease and desist orders;
debarment; violations; penalty; criminal penalty
A. No person may engage in the business of contracting, or act as a contractor
as defined in this Chapter, unless he holds an active license as a contractor in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. The board and residential
subcommittee may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license; issue cease and
desist orders to stop work; issue fines and penalties; or debar any person licensed
pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter for any of the following violations:
* * *
(8)
* * *
(c) Soliciting, receiving, or agreeing to receive, directly or indirectly, any
money, fee, commission, thing of value, or other compensation in exchange for
permitting a license, license number, classification, registration, or the name of a
licensee or registrant to be used by any other person.
* * *
§2159.2. Disaster-period direct solicitation; insurance-claim inducements; required
disclosures; contract remedies; license renting
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Catastrophe response period" means the six month period following the
initial declaration of a gubernatorially-declared disaster or emergency following a
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 924
natural disaster for residential property located in the emergency area and affected
by the natural disaster.
(2) "Direct solicitation" means a contact initiated by or on behalf of a person
offering to perform disaster-related residential contracting services directed to a
specific residential property owner or occupant, including any of the following:
(a) In-person contact at a residence with a residential property owner or
occupant that is not initiated at the request of the owner or occupant.
(b) The delivery or placement of written or printed materials at a residence
that encourage, induce, or invite the owner or occupant to make a property insurance
claim or to permit an inspection for the purpose of making a property insurance
claim.
(c) A telephone call, text message, electronic mail message, or other
electronic communication directed to a residential property owner or occupant, that
is not initiated at the request of the owner or occupant.
(3) "Disaster-related residential contracting services" means residential
roofing, tarping, water mitigation, remediation, or repairs, exterior repairs, home
improvement, or any other repair, reconstruction, or mitigation work to a residential
structure where the work is represented to relate to damage caused by a natural
disaster or peril that may be covered under a first-party property insurance policy.
(4) "Prohibited inducement" means any rebate, discount, waiver, promise to
pay or offset a deductible, gift, prize, cash, gift card, coupon, referral fee, or any
other thing of value offered, directly or indirectly, to a residential property owner or
occupant in connection with any of the following:
(a) Permitting an inspection of the residential property.
(b) Making, pursuing, or participating in a property insurance claim.
(5) "License renting" or "license lending" means any arrangement, whether
formal or informal, in which a licensee or registrant, directly or indirectly, for
compensation or other benefit, allows another person to use his license, license
number, classification, registration, or name of the licensee or registrant to advertise,
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 924
bid, contract, obtain permits, or perform work regulated by this Chapter, when that
other person is not the licensee or registrant.
B.(1) During a catastrophe response period, no person shall engage in direct
solicitation at a residence for disaster-related residential contracting services unless
that contact is initiated at the request of the residential property owner or occupant.
(2) A contractor violates this Subsection if any person working on behalf of
that contractor, including but not limited to a compensated employee or a non-
employee who is compensated by that contractor, violates this Subsection.
C. (1) No person offering disaster-related residential contracting services
shall do any of the following:
(a) Offer or provide a prohibited inducement.
(b) Represent, state, or imply that a residential property owner or occupant
will obtain insurance proceeds, will be approved for coverage, or is entitled to
coverage for a particular scope of work, except that this Subparagraph shall not
prohibit advising that owner to contact that owner's insurer or licensed insurance
professional.
(c) Represent, state, or imply that the person will handle, negotiate, present,
interpret, or adjust a property insurance claim on behalf of the insured, except as
otherwise permitted by law and licensure.
(2) This Subsection shall be construed in addition to, and not in limitation of,
R.S. 37:2159.1, R.S. 22:1275, and R.S. 51:451 et seq.
D.(1) Prior to obtaining any signature on a disaster repair contract, and prior
to accepting any deposit or consideration, a person offering disaster-related
residential contracting services during a catastrophe response period shall provide
the owner a written disclosure, in at least fourteen point bold type, containing all of
the following:
(a) The name of the contractor, the contractor's license number or registration
number, and any classifications.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 924
(b) A statement that the contractor is not a public adjuster and cannot
interpret the insurance policy or advise the owner regarding coverage.
(c) A statement that the owner is responsible for payment of any applicable
deductible and that it may be unlawful for a contractor to waive, absorb, or offset a
deductible.
(d) A statement that the owner may cancel a disaster repair contract within
ten days in accordance with R.S. 9:2784.1 and instructions for how to cancel.
(e) Contact information for the State Licensing Board for Contractors for
license verification and complaint intake.
(2) Failure to provide the written disclosure required by this Subsection shall
constitute a violation of this Chapter and extend the owner's right to cancel the
contract to thirty days from execution in accordance with R.S. 9:2784.1.
E.(1) Any contract entered into in violation of Subsection B or Subsection C
of this Section is voidable by the residential property owner for a period of one year
from execution.
(2) A voiding or rescission pursuant to this Section shall result in all of the
following:
(a) Any payment made by the homeowner before cancellation shall be
refunded promptly.
(b) The contractor is entitled to payment only for documented emergency
mitigation work requested by the owner and actually performed prior to cancellation,
and for materials actually ordered or delivered prior to cancellation, along with
reasonable overhead, provided that such amounts are itemized and supported by
documentation.
(3) Any purported waiver of the rights provided by this Section is null, void,
and unenforceable as against public policy.
F.(1) License renting is prohibited and constitutes a violation of this Chapter
and is a basis for discipline in accordance with R.S. 37:2158, including but not
limited to suspension, revocation, debarment, and fines.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 924
(2) In any disciplinary action alleging license renting, evidence that the
licensee or registrant accepted compensation from another person in connection with
that other person advertising, contracting, bidding, obtaining permits, or performing
work using the licensee's or registrant's license number, classification, registration,
or name shall create a rebuttable presumption of a violation of this Subsection.
G. The board may promulgate rules to implement this Section, including
model disclosure forms and complaint intake procedures.
H. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit any of the following:
(1) General advertising not directed to a specific residence or person.
(2) Emergency mitigation work requested by a residential property owner or
occupant.
§2164. Violations; civil penalty; jurisdiction
A.(1) Any person who violates any provision of this Chapter shall, after
notice and a hearing, be liable to the board for a fine of up to ten percent of the total
contract or the value of the work bid or being performed for which there is a
violation.
(2) For a violation of R.S. 37:2159.2, the board may impose a fine up to ten
percent of the total contract or value of the work, or five thousand dollars per
violation, whichever is greater.
(3) In addition to the fine, the board may impose administrative costs and
attorney fees for each offense. In determining the amount of the administrative
penalty, the board or residential subcommittee shall consider the circumstances and
seriousness of the violation, cooperation on the part of the contractor, and the history
of previous violations.
* * *